Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 2. Fishways and Hatcheries.

Secs. 41.14.840 — 41.14.900.
Fishway required; hatchery required; penalty for violating fishway and hatchery requirements; protection of fish and game; construction without approval prohibited; exemption for emergency situations; penalty for causing material damage; penalty for violations of AS 41.14.870 — 41.14.895. [Repealed § 38, E.O. No. 114 (2008).]